North Dakota, session 69, HB1271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 11-18-02.2 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
6. This section does not apply to deeds transferring title to the following types of property,
or to deeds relating to the following transactions:
a. Property owned or used by public utilities.
b. Property classified as personal property.
c. A sale when the grantor and the grantee are of the same family or corporate
affiliate, if known.
d. A sale that resulted as a settlement of an estate.
e. All forced sales, mortgage foreclosures, and tax sales.
f. All sales to or from religious, charitable, or nonprofit organizations.
g. All sales when there is an indicated change of use by the new owners.
h. All transfer of ownership of property for which is given a quitclaim deed is used to
correct a title defect.
i. Sales of property not assessable by law.
j. Agricultural lands of less than eighty acres [32.37 hectares].
Page No. 1 25.0967.01000